Maryland, session 2025, SB0413.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
14–1328.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CONSUMER CONTRACT” MEANS A CONTRACT
INVOLVING THE SALE, LEASE, OR PROVISION OF GOODS OR SERVICES THAT ARE FOR
PERSONAL, FAMILY, OR HOUSEHOLD PURPOSES.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0413*

SENATE BILL 413
(1) ANY CONSUMER CONTRACT PROVIDED BY A BUSINESS,
INCLUDING AN AFFILIATE OR A SUBSIDIARY OF THE BUSINESS, THAT IS DOING
BUSINESS UNDER A LICENSE, FRANCHISE AGREEMENT, CERTIFICATE, OR OTHER
AUTHORIZATION ISSUED BY A STATE AGENCY, POLITICAL SUBDIVISION, OR PUBLIC
UTILITY COMMISSION;
(2) A SERVICE REGULATED BY:
(I) THE MARYLAND PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION;
(II) THE FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION; OR
(III) THE FEDERAL ENERGY REGULATORY COMMISSION; OR
(3) A PERSON OR BUSINESS LICENSED TO PROVIDE SECURITY
SYSTEM SERVICES UNDER TITLE 18 OF THE BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND
PROFESSIONS ARTICLE.
(C) A PROVISION IN A CONSUMER CONTRACT THAT SETS A SHORTER TIME
TO BRING AN ACTION UNDER OR ON THE CONSUMER CONTRACT THAN REQUIRED BY
THE LAW OF THE STATE WHEN THE CONSUMER CONTRACT IS ISSUED OR DELIVERED
IS AGAINST STATE PUBLIC POLICY, ILLEGAL, AND VOID.
(C) (D) IF A CONSUMER CONTRACT CONTAINS A PROVISION THAT IS
ILLEGAL UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) A COURT MAY NOT GIVE EFFECT TO THE PROVISION; AND
(2) A DEFENSE TO LIABILITY UNDER THE CONSUMER CONTRACT MAY
NOT BE BASED ON THE SHORTER LIMITATION PERIOD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any contract entered into before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025 June 1, 2026.